Louisiana, session 2026, HB682.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:416.19.1 and 3996(B)(24) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§416.19.1. School guardians
A. "School guardian" means a veteran as defined in R.S. 13:5364, who meets
all of the following criteria:
(1) He was honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United
States as evidenced by a Department of Defense form DD 214.
(2) He successfully completed the requisite background check as provided
by applicable law.
(3) He completed school incident training with law enforcement and school
officials including but not limited to annual training in firearms safety, self-defense,
de-escalation tactics, mental health incidents, disability awareness, and training in
active threats at school, basic trauma, and first aid.
(4) He is employed or contracted by a city, parish, or other local public
school system, a nonpublic school, or a law enforcement agency.
(5) He operates under policies adopted by the public school governing
authority or nonpublic school regarding scope of duties, authority, and use of force.
(6) He is physically and mentally capable of performing assigned duties.
B. (1) A school guardian as provided in this Section shall not be considered
a peace officer, and shall not have arrest powers, unless separately commissioned in
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 682 ENROLLED
accordance with applicable law, and shall have only such authority as is expressly
granted by the employing authority and applicable law.
(2) A school guardian may take actions necessary to prevent an active threat
and temporarily detain an individual when the guardian has reasonable cause to
believe the individual has committed or is about to commit a felony.
(3) The provisions of Code of Criminal Procedure Article 214 shall apply to
actions taken by a guardian pursuant to this Subsection.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(24) School guardians, R.S. 17:416.19.1.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.